Massachusetts, session 194th, S1345.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 203 the following section:-
Section 204 (a) As used in this section, the following words, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, shall have the following meanings:-
“Employee”, shall have the same meaning as provided in clause (h) of section 1 of
chapter 151A.
“Employer”, shall have the same meaning as provided in subsection (i) of section 1 of
chapter 151A; except the United States government shall not be considered an employer;
provided, however, that an individual employer shall be determined by the Federal Employer
Identification Number.
of 3

“Pre-tax transportation fringe benefit,” a pre-tax election transportation fringe benefit that
provides commuter highway vehicle and transit benefits, consistent with the provisions and
limits of section 132(f)(1)(A), (B), and (D) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986
(26 U.S.C. s.132(f)(1)(A), (B), and (D)) at the maximum benefit levels allowable under federal
law, to be deducted for those programs from an employee’s gross income pursuant to section
132(f)(2) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.132(f)(2)).
(b) Every employer in the commonwealth of Massachusetts that employs at least 50
persons shall offer to all of that employer’s employees, that are not covered by a collective
bargaining agreement, the opportunity to utilize a pre-tax transportation fringe benefit; provided,
nothing herein shall prevent an employer and employees covered by a collective bargaining
agreement from bargaining to include a pre-tax transportation fringe benefit in such agreement.
(c) Any employer found to be in violation of this section shall be liable for a fine of $100
for a first violation. For each additional month in which an employer fails to offer a pre-tax
transportation fringe benefit shall constitute a subsequent violation and a fine of $250 shall be
imposed for each subsequent violation. A fine shall not be imposed on any individual employer
more than once in a month.
(d) The department of revenue shall direct a public multilingual awareness campaign in
conjunction with the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority that encourages the public to
contact employers about pre-tax transportation fringe benefits and shall coordinate such
campaign with regional planning agencies, transportation management associations, regional
transportation authorities, chambers of commerce, private and non-profit providers of public
transportation, and other transportation stakeholders. The department of revenue shall prepare
of 3

and disseminate model multilingual written materials to be used by employers to notify
employees of the pre-tax transportation fringe benefits offered.
(e) The commissioner of the department of revenue shall adopt regulations to ensure
compliance and implementation of the provisions of this section, including but not limited to, a
process by which employees and others can confidentially report non-compliant employers.
SECTION 2. Subsection (c) of Section 1 shall take effect one year after the passage of
this act.
of 3